District of Columbia statutes.
34-2703

Availability of permit drawings.

The District of Columbia Department of Transportation shall make available to each public utility operator a copy of all approved permit drawings, including those which bear the exact nature and location of all excavation to be carried out, as they are issued to persons for excavation or demolition in public space where utility facilities exist. Applicants for permits will provide additional copies of plans as required for this purpose.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-129, § 4, 28 DCR 264

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1703.

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.